Hawaii, session 2025, SB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the state highway fund of the State of Hawaii, the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026; to be deposited into the automated speed enforcement systems program special fund established by Act 112, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the automated speed enforcement systems program special fund the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the establishment and maintenance of the automated speed enforcement systems program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. Any provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, the appropriation authorized under this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.  Any unexpended and unencumbered balance of the appropriation made in this Act as of the close of business on June 30, 2029, shall lapse back to the credit of the state highway fund. SECTION 4. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST